src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Meänkieli verbs

!! This file documents ['affixes/verbs.lexc', the file for Meänkieli verb morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)  

!! ## Overview over the continuation classes

!! ### Continuation lexica for regular verbs
!!  * **v1** = general even-syll-stems of antaa-type; sanoa:sano
!!  * **v1_odd** = odd-syll-stem of antaa-type; herättää:herättä, like v1 except PrfPrc+Sg herättänny 
!!  * **v1_otta** = kirjottaa etc (to make Err/Orth-form)
!!  * **v1_tietaa** = tietää:ti because of changes in diftong (tiän>tiesin)
!!  * **v1_var** = mahtaa:mahta>mahtan AND mahan !TBC - where does it occur?
!!  * **v1_odd_var** = tapahtua:tapahtu>tapahtun AND tapahun !TBC - where does it occur?
!!  * **v1_taitaa** = taitaa:taita lexicon because of t:s (although no a:0 in suffix)

!!  * **v2** = cont lex for general forms from v2_ata, v2_ata_even and v2_uta
!!  * **v2_ata_odd** = -ata-verbs; masinata:masina (+^A i Sg3, InfMa+Ade masinaamala)
!!  * **v2_ata_even** = even-stem -ata-verbs; huomata:huoma, tryykätä:tryykkä (+^A i Sg3, InfMa+Ade huomaamalla)
!!  * **v2_uta** = Vta-verbs; leipota:leippo, mullita:mulli (+^A^A i Sg3)
!!  * **v2_havata** = ONLY havata:hava
!!  * **v2_Hata_even** = kohata:kohta

!!  * **v3_ja** = voija:voi, uija etc
!!  * **v3_ja_short** = viejä:vi etc, to get inf.form viä
!!  * **v3_ha** = saaja, jääjä etc
!!  * **v3_jua** = jua:ju, lua, sua, tua
!!  * **v3_syä** syä:sy, myä, lyä
!!  * **v3_tehha** = ONLY tehhä:te, tehä, tehjä
!!  * **v3_nahha** = ONLY nähhä:nä, nähä, nähjä
!!  * **v3_kaya** = ONLY käyä:kä
!!  * **v3_ta** =  myyta:my, 
!!  * **v3_a** = for infinitive forms with 'a; saa'a:saa
!!  * **v3_j** = cont lex for v3_ja, v3_a, v3_ha
!!  * **v3_other** = cont lex for all v3; prs-forms, prt-forms etc.

!!  * **v4** = tulla:tul
!!  * **v4_sta** = nousta:nous
!!  * **v4_juosta** = juos:juo
!!  * **v4_la_odd** = mairiskela:mairiske, nuola:nuo
!!  * **v4_la_even** = varjela:varje >varjelee
!!  * **v4_la** = cont lexicon for v4_la_odd/even
!!  * **v4_lla_odd** = levahella:levahtel
!!  * **v4_lla_even** = kaaella:kaatel
!!  * **v4_lla** = cont lexicon for v4_lla_odd/even
!!  * **v4_julkasta** = rangasta:rangas etc
!!  * **v4_julkas** = cont lexicon for v4_julkasta

!!  * **v5** = tarvita:tarv
!!  * **v5_keritä** = keritä:ker
!!  * **v6** = paeta:pake
!!  * **v_vanheta** = vanheta
!!  * **vx** = unassigned

!(REMOVED: **v3_ja_long** = palmikoija:palmikoi; like v3_ja except Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:palmikoijut)

!! ### Irregular verbs
!!  * **OLLA**
!!  * **NEG**


!! ## The verb lexica themselves

LEXICON vx !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pointing to *v1*
v1 ; ! vx

!! # Irregular verbs

LEXICON OLLA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** olla-paradigm
+V+Inf:olla KK ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:olen K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:olet K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:oon K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:soon K ; !
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:olema K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:oletta K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:oon K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:noon K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ovva K ; ! CHECK kan det vara Use/NG?
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ovat K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:oova K ; !CHECK EK

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:olin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:olit K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:oli K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:olima K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:olitta K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:oli K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:olit K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:olthiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:oliva K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:olivat K ;

!+V+Act+Cond:olis 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:olisin K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:olisit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:olis K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3+Err/Orth:olisi K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:olis%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:olis%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:olis%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Use/NG:olis%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:olis%>iv^At K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:olhaan K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:olthaan K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:olthiin K ;  
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ole K ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: olko K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:ollu K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:olhee ptc_obl ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:ollu K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:oltu K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:ollut K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:oltava K ; !oltavva?
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:oltavat K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl:olheet K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:olis K ;
+V+Pass+Cond+Err/Orth:olisi K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Der+Der/A+A:olleeva x3 ; !??
+V+Act+PrsPrc:ole%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Der+Der/A+A:oltava x3 ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:ole K ;

! These are standard Finnish forms marked as Err/Orth.
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:on K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Err/Orth:olemme K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Err/Orth:olette K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ollut K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg+Err/Orth:ollut K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:ollee ptc_obl ; !THIS GETS GENERATED with hdfit!!
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl+Err/Orth:olleet K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:ole # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg3:ol%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl1:ol%>khaamme # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:ol%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:ol%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+InfE+Ins:ollen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:ollessa K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:ollessa K ; !CHECK
+V+InfMa:ole 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ole%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; 
+V+AgPrc:olema K ;

! ! Derivation
+V+Der/minen:olemi nen ;

LEXICON NEG !!≈ * **@CODE@** negation verb
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg1:en NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg2:et NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg3:ei NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:sole # ; !se ei ole
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Pl1:emmä NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Pl2:että NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Pl3:ei NEGK ;

+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2:älä NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2:älkää # ;

!! # Regular verbs

LEXICON v1_otta !!≈ * **@CODE@** otta-lexicon
:otta v1_odd ; ! korrekt
+Err/Orth:oitta v1 ; ! finska
