src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
olla: OLLA ; 
ei: NEG ;    
kirjottaa:kirj v1_otta ;
allekirjottaa:alle#kirj v1_otta ;
yytraaka:yytraak vx ; !yytraakata? CHECK LLEK
